Georgia, session 2025_26, HB842.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act providing a homestead exemption from Whitfield County ad valorem taxes for
county purposes in the amount of $250,000.00 of the appraised value of the homestead for
residents of that county who are 70 years of age or over, approved May 3, 2023 (Ga. L. 2023,
p. 4357) is amended by revising subsections (b) and (f) of Section 1 as follows:
"(b) Each resident of Whitfield County who is 70 years of age or older on or before
January 1 of the year in which application for the exemption under this Act is made is
granted an exemption on that person's homestead from Whitfield County ad valorem taxes
H. B. 842
- 1 -

LC 47 3669/AP
for county purposes in the amount of $325,000.00 of the appraised value of that
homestead."
"(f) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026."
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The election superintendent of Whitfield County shall call and conduct an election as
provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of the Whitfield
County for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall conduct that election on
the Tuesday following the first Monday in November, 2025, and shall issue the call and
conduct that election as provided by general law. The election superintendent shall cause the
date and purpose of the election to be published once a week for two weeks immediately
preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Whitfield County. The ballot shall have
written or printed thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which revises the homestead exemption from
Whitfield County ad valorem taxes for county purposes from $250,000.00
( ) NO of the appraised value to $325,000.00 of the appraised value of the
homestead for residents of that school district who are 70 years of age or
older?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
H. B. 842
- 2 -

LC 47 3669/AP
effect on January 1, 2026. If this Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day immediately following that election
date. The expense of such election shall be borne by the Whitfield County. It shall be the
election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State. The
provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the election superintendent and are not
intended as directory. If the election superintendent fails or refuses to comply with this
section, any elector of the Whitfield County may apply for a writ of mandamus to compel
the election superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the court finds
that the election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall fashion
appropriate relief requiring the election superintendent to call and conduct such election on
the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for special elections provided
for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
SECTION 4.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 842
- 3 -